Indiana, session 2026, SB8.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
1 SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-17-20.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
2 SECTION 44, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
3 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20.3. (a) Except as provided in section 20.4 of this
4 chapter, this section applies only to the governing body of a public
5 library that:
6 (1) is not comprised of a majority of officials who are elected to
7 serve on the governing body; and
8 (2) has a percentage increase in the proposed budget for the
9 taxing unit for the ensuing calendar year that is more than the
10 result equal to or more than fifty percent (50%) of
11 (A) the maximum levy growth quotient determined under
12 IC 6-1.1-18.5-2 for the ensuing calendar year, rounded to the
13 nearest thousandth (0.001). minus
14 (B) one (1).
15 For purposes of this section, an individual who qualifies to be
16 appointed to a governing body or serves on a governing body because
17 of the individual's status as an elected official of another taxing unit
SB 8—LS 6066/DI 129

2
1 shall be treated as an official who was not elected to serve on the
2 governing body.
3 (b) This section does not apply to an entity whose tax levies are
4 subject to review and modification by a city-county legislative body
5 under IC 36-3-6-9.
6 (c) If:
7 (1) the assessed valuation of a public library's territory is entirely
8 contained within a city or town; or
9 (2) the assessed valuation of a public library's territory is not
10 entirely contained within a city or town but more than fifty
11 percent (50%) of the assessed valuation of the public library's
12 territory is contained within the city or town;
13 the governing body shall submit its proposed budget and property tax
14 levy to the city or town fiscal body in the manner prescribed by the
15 department of local government finance before September 2 of a year.
16 However, the governing body shall submit its proposed budget and
17 property tax levy to the county fiscal body in the manner provided in
18 subsection (d), rather than to the city or town fiscal body, if more than
19 fifty percent (50%) of the parcels of real property within the
20 jurisdiction of the public library are located outside the city or town.
21 (d) If subsection (c) does not apply or the public library's territory
22 covers more than one (1) county, the governing body of the public
23 library shall submit its proposed budget and property tax levy to the
24 county fiscal body in the county where the public library has the most
25 assessed valuation. The proposed budget and levy shall be submitted
26 to the county fiscal body in the manner prescribed by the department
27 of local government finance before September 2 of a year.
28 (e) The fiscal body of the city, town, or county (whichever applies)
29 shall review each budget and proposed tax levy and adopt a final
30 budget and tax levy for the public library. The fiscal body may reduce
31 or modify but not increase the proposed budget or tax levy.
32 (f) If a public library fails to file the information required in
33 subsection (c) or (d), whichever applies, with the appropriate fiscal
34 body by the time prescribed by this section, when calculating the
35 maximum ad valorem property tax levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a) for
36 the public library for the ensuing budget year, instead of multiplying
37 the maximum levy growth quotient determined under
38 IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(b) or IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(e) (as applicable) for the year by
39 the public library's maximum permissible ad valorem property tax levy
40 for the preceding calendar year as prescribed in STEP TWO of
41 IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a), for purposes of STEP TWO of IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a),
42 the public library's maximum permissible ad valorem property tax levy
SB 8—LS 6066/DI 129

3
1 for the preceding calendar year must instead be multiplied by the result
2 of the following:
3 STEP ONE: Determine:
4 (A) the result of STEP FOUR of IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(b) or STEP
5 FIVE of IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(e) (as applicable); minus
6 (B) one (1).
7 STEP TWO: Multiply:
8 (A) the STEP ONE result; by
9 (B) eight-tenths (0.8).
10 STEP THREE: Add one (1) to the STEP TWO result.
11 However, if the public library files the information as required in
12 subsection (c) or (d), whichever applies, for the budget year
13 immediately following the budget year for which the formula under this
14 subsection is applied, when calculating the maximum ad valorem
15 property tax levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a) for the public library for the
16 subsequent budget year, the public library's maximum permissible ad
17 valorem property tax levy must be calculated as if the formula under
18 this subsection had not been applied for the affected budget year.
19 (g) If the appropriate fiscal body fails to complete the requirements
20 of subsection (e) before the adoption deadline in section 5 of this
21 chapter for any public library subject to this section, when calculating
22 the maximum ad valorem property tax levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a)
23 for the city, town, or county for the ensuing budget year, instead of
24 multiplying the maximum levy growth quotient determined under
25 IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(b) or IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(e) (as applicable) for the year by
26 the city's, town's, or county's maximum permissible ad valorem
27 property tax levy for the preceding calendar year as prescribed in STEP
28 TWO of IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a), for purposes of STEP TWO of
29 IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a), the city's, town's, or county's maximum permissible
30 ad valorem property tax levy for the preceding calendar year must
31 instead be multiplied by the result of the following:
32 STEP ONE: Determine:
33 (A) the result of STEP FOUR of IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(b) or STEP
34 FIVE of IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(e) (as applicable); minus
35 (B) one (1).
36 STEP TWO: Multiply:
37 (A) the STEP ONE result; by
38 (B) eight-tenths (0.8).
39 STEP THREE: Add one (1) to the STEP TWO result.
40 However, if the city, town, or county files the information as required
41 in subsection (e) for the budget year immediately following the budget
42 year for which the formula under this subsection is applied, when
SB 8—LS 6066/DI 129

4
1 calculating the maximum ad valorem property tax levy under
2 IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a) for the city, town, or county for the subsequent
3 budget year, the unit's maximum permissible ad valorem property tax
4 levy must be calculated as if the formula under this subsection had not
5 been applied for the affected budget year.
SB 8—LS 6066/DI 129

5
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Tax and Fiscal Policy, to
which was referred Senate Bill No. 8, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 1, line 11, reset in roman "a public library".
Page 1, line 12, reset in roman "or".
Page 2, line 3, reset in roman "or".
Page 2, line 5, delete "or".
Page 2, delete lines 6 through 8.
Page 2, line 13, delete "However, the governing body shall submit
its proposed".
Page 2, delete lines 14 through 18.
Page 2, line 19, delete "or, in the case of a public".
Page 2, delete line 20.
Page 2, line 21, delete "county,".
Page 4, delete lines 4 through 42.
Delete pages 5 through 7.
Page 8, delete lines 1 through 35, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-17-20.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 44, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20.3. (a) Except as provided in section 20.4 of this
chapter, this section applies only to the governing body of a public
library that:
(1) is not comprised of a majority of officials who are elected to
serve on the governing body; and
(2) has a percentage increase in the proposed budget for the
taxing unit for the ensuing calendar year that is more than the
result equal to or more than fifty percent (50%) of
(A) the maximum levy growth quotient determined under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2 for the ensuing calendar year, rounded to the
nearest thousandth (0.001). minus
(B) one (1).
For purposes of this section, an individual who qualifies to be
appointed to a governing body or serves on a governing body because
of the individual's status as an elected official of another taxing unit
shall be treated as an official who was not elected to serve on the
governing body.
(b) This section does not apply to an entity whose tax levies are
subject to review and modification by a city-county legislative body
under IC 36-3-6-9.
SB 8—LS 6066/DI 129

6
(c) If:
(1) the assessed valuation of a public library's territory is entirely
contained within a city or town; or
(2) the assessed valuation of a public library's territory is not
entirely contained within a city or town but more than fifty
percent (50%) of the assessed valuation of the public library's
territory is contained within the city or town;
the governing body shall submit its proposed budget and property tax
levy to the city or town fiscal body in the manner prescribed by the
department of local government finance before September 2 of a year.
However, the governing body shall submit its proposed budget and
property tax levy to the county fiscal body in the manner provided in
subsection (d), rather than to the city or town fiscal body, if more than
fifty percent (50%) of the parcels of real property within the
jurisdiction of the public library are located outside the city or town.
(d) If subsection (c) does not apply or the public library's territory
covers more than one (1) county, the governing body of the public
library shall submit its proposed budget and property tax levy to the
county fiscal body in the county where the public library has the most
assessed valuation. The proposed budget and levy shall be submitted
to the county fiscal body in the manner prescribed by the department
of local government finance before September 2 of a year.
(e) The fiscal body of the city, town, or county (whichever applies)
shall review each budget and proposed tax levy and adopt a final
budget and tax levy for the public library. The fiscal body may reduce
or modify but not increase the proposed budget or tax levy.
(f) If a public library fails to file the information required in
subsection (c) or (d), whichever applies, with the appropriate fiscal
body by the time prescribed by this section, when calculating the
maximum ad valorem property tax levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a) for
the public library for the ensuing budget year, instead of multiplying
the maximum levy growth quotient determined under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(b) or IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(e) (as applicable) for the year by
the public library's maximum permissible ad valorem property tax levy
for the preceding calendar year as prescribed in STEP TWO of
IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a), for purposes of STEP TWO of IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a),
the public library's maximum permissible ad valorem property tax levy
for the preceding calendar year must instead be multiplied by the result
of the following:
STEP ONE: Determine:
(A) the result of STEP FOUR of IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(b) or STEP
FIVE of IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(e) (as applicable); minus
SB 8—LS 6066/DI 129

7
(B) one (1).
STEP TWO: Multiply:
(A) the STEP ONE result; by
(B) eight-tenths (0.8).
STEP THREE: Add one (1) to the STEP TWO result.
However, if the public library files the information as required in
subsection (c) or (d), whichever applies, for the budget year
immediately following the budget year for which the formula under this
subsection is applied, when calculating the maximum ad valorem
property tax levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a) for the public library for the
subsequent budget year, the public library's maximum permissible ad
valorem property tax levy must be calculated as if the formula under
this subsection had not been applied for the affected budget year.
(g) If the appropriate fiscal body fails to complete the requirements
of subsection (e) before the adoption deadline in section 5 of this
chapter for any public library subject to this section, when calculating
the maximum ad valorem property tax levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a)
for the city, town, or county for the ensuing budget year, instead of
multiplying the maximum levy growth quotient determined under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(b) or IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(e) (as applicable) for the year by
the city's, town's, or county's maximum permissible ad valorem
property tax levy for the preceding calendar year as prescribed in STEP
TWO of IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a), for purposes of STEP TWO of
IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a), the city's, town's, or county's maximum permissible
ad valorem property tax levy for the preceding calendar year must
instead be multiplied by the result of the following:
STEP ONE: Determine:
(A) the result of STEP FOUR of IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(b) or STEP
FIVE of IC 6-1.1-18.5-2(e) (as applicable); minus
(B) one (1).
STEP TWO: Multiply:
(A) the STEP ONE result; by
(B) eight-tenths (0.8).
STEP THREE: Add one (1) to the STEP TWO result.
However, if the city, town, or county files the information as required
in subsection (e) for the budget year immediately following the budget
year for which the formula under this subsection is applied, when
calculating the maximum ad valorem property tax levy under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-3(a) for the city, town, or county for the subsequent
budget year, the unit's maximum permissible ad valorem property tax
levy must be calculated as if the formula under this subsection had not
been applied for the affected budget year.".
SB 8—LS 6066/DI 129

8
Page 8, delete lines 36 through 42.
Delete pages 9 through 13.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 8 as introduced.)
HOLDMAN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 9, Nays 1.
SB 8—LS 6066/DI 129